Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201673-305
Director of Administrative Services;
report required.

The Director of Administrative Services
shall, within forty-five days after receipt of the information described in
sections 73-302 and 73-303 from the state agency, prepare a report detailing
why the proposed contract was approved or disapproved. The report shall be
delivered electronically to
the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature and the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst.

Laws 1995, LB 519, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 133.